Maryland, session 2025, SB0871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
– 1 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SUBTITLE 27. COMMUNITY WATER AND SEWERAGE SYSTEM CYBERSECURITY.
9–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–501 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) “COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–401 OF
THIS TITLE.
(D) “CYBERSECURITY” MEANS PROCESSES OR CAPABILITIES WHEREIN
SYSTEMS, COMMUNICATIONS, AND INFORMATION ARE PROTECTED AND DEFENDED
AGAINST DAMAGE, UNAUTHORIZED USE OR MODIFICATION, AND EXPLOITATION.
(E) “EMERGENCY MANAGER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–101 OF
THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(F) (1) “OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY” MEANS PROGRAMMABLE SYSTEMS
OR DEVICES THAT INTERACT WITH THE PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT BY DETECTING OR
CAUSING A DIRECT CHANGE THROUGH THE MONITORING OR CONTROL OF DEVICES,
PROCESSES, AND EVENTS.
(2) “OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY” INCLUDES:
(I) INDUSTRIAL CONTROL SYSTEMS;
(II) BUILDING MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS;
(III) FIRE CONTROL SYSTEMS; AND
(IV) PHYSICAL ACCESS CONTROL MECHANISMS.
(F) (G) “WATER AND WASTEWATER SECTOR” MEANS ALL PROVIDERS,
INCLUDING PRIVATE AND PUBLIC, OF WATER SUPPLY OR SEWERAGE SERVICES.
(G) (H) “ZERO–TRUST” MEANS A CYBERSECURITY APPROACH:
(1) FOCUSED ON CYBERSECURITY RESOURCE PROTECTION; AND
(2) BASED ON THE PREMISE THAT TRUST IS NEVER GRANTED
IMPLICITLY BUT MUST BE CONTINUALLY EVALUATED.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 495
9–2702.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY AND THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT,
COORDINATE CYBERSECURITY EFFORTS WITHIN COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEMS;
(2) INCLUDE CYBERSECURITY AWARENESS COMPONENTS FOR ALL
NEW AND RENEWING OPERATOR AND SUPERINTENDENT CERTIFICATIONS UNDER
TITLE 12 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY:
(I) UPDATE REGULATIONS GOVERNING COMMUNITY WATER
SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEMS TO:
1. INCLUDE COMPREHENSIVE SECTIONS REGARDING
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS FOR WATER AND WASTEWATER TREATMENT
FACILITIES; AND
2. REQUIRE COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM PROVIDERS TO REPORT CYBER INCIDENTS
CONSISTENT WITH DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY GUIDANCE TO
UTILITIES REGARDING CYBER INCIDENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–2707(B) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) PROMULGATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS FOR
ESTABLISHED COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEMS
THAT MEET OR EXCEED THE FEDERAL CYBERSECURITY AND INFRASTRUCTURE
SECURITY AGENCY’S CROSS–SECTOR CYBERSECURITY PERFORMANCE GOALS;
(III) REQUIRE COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY
SEWERAGE SYSTEMS TO PLAN FOR DISRUPTIONS OF SERVICE DUE TO CYBER
INCIDENTS, INCLUDING RANSOMWARE ATTACKS AND OTHER EVENTS RESULTING IN
ROOT–LEVEL COMPROMISE;
(IV) ESTABLISH A LIST OF APPROVED CYBERSECURITY
TRAINING PROGRAMS FOR STAFF RESPONSIBLE FOR MAINTAINING OR OPERATING
WATER AND WASTEWATER FACILITIES; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) IMPLEMENT MEASURES TO PROTECT THE ACTIVE
CERTIFIED OPERATORS LIST MAINTAINED ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE WHILE
ENSURING LEGITIMATE ACCESS FOR NECESSARY PURPOSES.
9–2703.
THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SHALL:
(1) EMPLOY A PERSON TRAINED IN THE CYBERSECURITY OF
OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY TO WORK:
(I) WORK WITH THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICER AND THE CYBER PREPAREDNESS UNIT IN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT TO SUPPORT EFFORTS RELATED TO OPERATIONAL
TECHNOLOGY IN WATER SYSTEMS AND OTHER CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(II) COORDINATE WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICERS TO ASSIST IN PROTECTING COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEMS;
(2) ALLOW ALL MEMBERS OF THE WATER AND WASTEWATER SECTOR
IN THE STATE TO JOIN THE MARYLAND INFORMATION SHARING AND ANALYSIS
CENTER TO FURTHER STRENGTHEN CYBERSECURITY EFFORTS AND INFORMATION
SHARING WITHIN THE SECTOR; AND
(3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, DEVELOP AND
PROMOTE A GUIDANCE DOCUMENT THAT:
(I) PROVIDES STANDARDS THAT MEET OR EXCEED THE
FEDERAL CYBERSECURITY AND INFRASTRUCTURE SECURITY AGENCY’S
CROSS–SECTOR CYBERSECURITY PERFORMANCE GOALS; AND
(II) OUTLINES THE BEST PRACTICES BEYOND MINIMUM
STANDARDS THAT CAN SERVE AS A POINT OF REFERENCE FOR ENHANCING THE
CYBERSECURITY POSTURE OF COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND COMMUNITY
SEWERAGE SYSTEM PROVIDERS; AND
(4) PROVIDE RESOURCES FOR CYBERSECURITY SPRINT TARGETING
OF COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM PROVIDERS
TO IDENTIFY WEAKNESSES AND ASSIST WITH SECURITY IMPROVEMENTS.
9–2704.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 495
ALL COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM
PROVIDERS IN THE STATE SHALL:
(1) APPOINT A PRIMARY POINT OF CONTACT FOR CYBERSECURITY TO
INTERACT WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
APPROPRIATE LOCAL EMERGENCY MANAGER AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY REGARDING CYBERSECURITY–RELATED MATTERS;
AND
(2) ATTEND ANNUAL TRAININGS TO IMPROVE CYBERSECURITY
AWARENESS.
9–2705.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM OR
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM IN THE STATE THAT:
(1) SERVES SERVES OVER 3,300 CUSTOMERS; OR
(2) UTILIZES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AND OPERATIONAL
TECHNOLOGY AS PART OF ITS OPERATIONS.
(B) EACH COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE
SYSTEM PROVIDER SHALL:
(1) ADOPT AND IMPLEMENT CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS THAT ARE
EQUAL TO OR EXCEED THE STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
9–2702(3)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ADOPT COMMIT TO ADOPTING A ZERO–TRUST CYBERSECURITY
APPROACH, SIMILAR TO AND BEGIN PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTING THE
ZERO–TRUST APPROACH, AS APPROPRIATE FOR EACH SYSTEM, MODELED AFTER
THE FEDERAL CYBERSECURITY AND INFRASTRUCTURE SECURITY AGENCY’S
ZERO–TRUST MATURITY MODEL, FOR ON–PREMISES SERVICES AND CLOUD–BASED
SERVICES; AND
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 EVERY 2 YEARS
THEREAFTER, ENGAGE WITH A THIRD PARTY TO CONDUCT AN A MATURITY
ASSESSMENT OF THE ITS CYBERSECURITY PROGRAM FOR OPERATIONAL
TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVICES OF THE COMMUNITY
WATER SYSTEM OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM, BASED ON THE MINIMUM
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–2702(3)(II) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
– 5 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
9–2706.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE OFFICE OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT IN THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SHALL:
(1) COLLECT CERTIFICATIONS OF EACH COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM
AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM PROVIDER’S COMPLIANCE WITH STANDARDS
USED IN THE ASSESSMENTS CONDUCTED UNDER § 9–2705(B)(4) § 9–2705(B)(3) OF
THIS SUBTITLE FOR CYBERSECURITY–RELATED POLICIES AND PROCEDURES; AND
(2) SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICER, OR THE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A GENERAL OVERVIEW OF CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY AND
POLICIES USED BY COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE
SYSTEMS IN THE STATE, GROUPED BY NUMBER OF CUSTOMERS SERVED; AND
(2) GENERAL RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVING CYBERSECURITY
TECHNOLOGY AND POLICIES USED BY COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEMS IN THE STATE, GROUPED BY NUMBER OF
CUSTOMERS SERVED.
9–2707.
(A) EACH COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM AND COMMUNITY SEWERAGE
SYSTEM SHALL REPORT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT, INCLUDING AN
ATTACK ON AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEM OR OPERATIONAL
TECHNOLOGY SYSTEM BEING USED BY THE COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM OR
COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM PROVIDER, TO THE STATE SECURITY OPERATIONS
CENTER IN THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
(B) (1) THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR
COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM PROVIDERS, COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM
PROVIDERS, AND OTHER MEMBERS OF THE WATER AND WASTEWATER SECTOR TO
REPORT CYBERSECURITY INCIDENTS.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 495
(2) THE REPORTING PROCESS SHALL SPECIFY:
(I) THE CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH AN INCIDENT MUST BE
REPORTED;
(II) THE MANNER IN WHICH AN ENTITY MUST REPORT AN
INCIDENT; AND
(III) THE TIME PERIOD WITHIN WHICH AN ENTITY MUST REPORT
AN INCIDENT.
(C) THE STATE SECURITY OPERATIONS CENTER SHALL IMMEDIATELY
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE OTHER APPROPRIATE STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES OF A CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT REPORTED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE OFFICE OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT IN THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SHALL PUBLISH A REPORT THAT DESCRIBES THE NUMBER AND TYPE
OF INCIDENTS REPORTED BY COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY
SEWERAGE SYSTEMS IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT
IDENTIFY THE IMPACTED COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE
SYSTEMS.
9–2708.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON WATER SYSTEM COMPLIANCE
AND THE PROGRESS MADE REGARDING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – General Provisions
4–338.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 7 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–501 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–401 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(4) (I) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 1–101 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(II) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” INCLUDES:
1. A COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM; AND
2. A COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM.
(5) “OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–2701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) A custodian shall deny inspection of the part of a public record that contains
information about the security of an information system, OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY,
OR CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING ANY RECORDS OF A COMMUNITY
WATER SYSTEM OR COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM.
Article – Public Safety
14–104.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “COMMUNITY SEWERAGE SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–501 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–401 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “CRISIS AND EMERGENCY RISK COMMUNICATION PLAN” MEANS A
PLAN FOR COMMUNICATING DURING AN EMERGENCY.
[(2)] (5) “Local government” includes local school systems, local school
boards, and local health departments.
[(3)] (6) “Unit” means the Cyber Preparedness Unit.
(b) (1) There is a Cyber Preparedness Unit in the Department.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 495
(2) In coordination with the State Chief Information Security Officer, the
Unit shall:
(i) support local governments in developing a vulnerability
assessment and cyber assessment, including providing local governments with the
resources and information on best practices to complete the assessments;
(ii) develop and regularly update an online database of cybersecurity
training resources for local government personnel, including technical training resources,
cybersecurity continuity of operations templates, consequence management plans, and
trainings on malware and ransomware detection;
(iii) assist local governments in[:
1.] the development of cybersecurity preparedness and
response plans[;], INCLUDING:
[2.] 1. implementing best practices and guidance
developed by the State Chief Information Security Officer; [and]
[3.] 2. identifying and acquiring resources to complete
appropriate cybersecurity vulnerability assessments; AND
3. PLANNING PROVIDING GUIDANCE TO LOCAL
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATIONS FOR INCIDENTS AGAINST WATER AND
WASTEWATER FACILITIES, INCLUDING ENSURING THAT THERE ARE PLANS FOR
ALTERNATIVE WATER SUPPLIES AND MUTUAL AID AGREEMENTS SHOULD WATER
SERVICES BECOME UNAVAILABLE;
(iv) connect local governments to appropriate resources for any other
purpose related to cybersecurity preparedness and response;
(v) as necessary and in coordination with the National Guard, local
emergency managers, and other State and local entities, conduct regional cybersecurity
preparedness exercises; [and]
(vi) establish regional assistance groups to deliver and coordinate
support services to local governments, agencies, or regions; AND
(VII) ANNUALLY HOST AT LEAST ONE TABLETOP EXERCISE,
TAILORED TO THE STATE’S WATER AND WASTEWATER SECTOR, TO CONTINUE
REFINING STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT RESPONSES TO CYBER INCIDENTS; AND
– 9 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VIII) DEVELOP A GUIDANCE FOR CRISIS AND EMERGENCY RISK
COMMUNICATION PLAN FOR COMMUNITY WATER SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY
SEWERAGE SYSTEMS LOCAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATIONS IN THE
STATE.
(3) The Unit shall support the Office of Security Management in the
Department of Information Technology during emergency response efforts.
(c) (1) Each local government shall report a cybersecurity incident, including
an attack on a State system being used by the local government, to the appropriate local
emergency manager and the State Security Operations Center in the Department of
Information Technology and to the Maryland Joint Operations Center in the Department
in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) For the reporting of cybersecurity incidents under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the State Chief Information Security Officer shall determine:
(i) the criteria for determining when an incident must be reported;
(ii) the manner in which to report; and
(iii) the time period within which a report must be made.
(3) The State Security Operations Center shall immediately notify
appropriate agencies of a cybersecurity incident reported under this subsection through the
State Security Operations Center.
(d) (1) Five Position Identification Numbers (PINs) shall be created for the
purpose of hiring staff to conduct the duties of the Maryland Department of Emergency
Management Cybersecurity Preparedness Unit.
(2) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least:
(i) $220,335 for 3 PINs for Administrator III positions; and
(ii) $137,643 for 2 PINs for Administrator II positions.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE CYBERSECURITY ATTACK INFORMATION ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S “KNOW THE THREATS” WEBSITE; AND
(2) CONSIDER USING MD READY AS AN ALERT SYSTEM IF NECESSARY
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 495
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) the Department of the Environment, in consultation with the
Department of Information Technology, conduct a comprehensive education campaign
targeted at leaders within the water and wastewater sector, emphasizing the economic
value of cybersecurity prevention over remediation;
(2) the Maryland Department of Emergency Management prioritize
tabletop exercises focused on water cybersecurity; and
(3) the Department of the Environment work closely with the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency, the U.S. Department of Defense, and other relevant
organizations to identify and access resources available for local community water systems
and community sewerage systems.
(b) The education campaign under subsection (a) of this section shall include
mention of the following information and materials:
(1) the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s Incident Action
Checklist – Cybersecurity for all water and wastewater systems in the State;
(2) the National Institute of Standards and Technology’s:
(i) Cybersecurity Framework 2.0;
(ii) Special Publication 800–82r3; and
(iii) security recommendations;
(3) reference models appropriate to the State’s water and wastewater
sector’s operational technology networks to guide security improvements;
(4) best practices, including network segmentation;
(5) the federal Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency’s “Top
Cyber Actions for Securing Water Systems” fact sheet;
(6) the U.S. Department of Energy’s Supply Chain Cybersecurity
Principles;
(7) information on third–party risks to water and wastewater facilities and
networks; and
– 11 –

Ch. 495 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) free resources available from federal agencies, including the
Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency’s:
(i) Cross–Sector Cybersecurity Goals; and
(ii) Cybersecurity Evaluation Tool.
(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of the Environment shall report to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on its
efforts under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 12 –